Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-220.02
State and county fairs; carnival companies, booking agencies, and shows; security; action for damages.

The Nebraska State Fair Board, county agricultural society, or county fair board may bring suit upon the deposit or bond required by section 2-220.01 in the county where such contract was to have been performed to recover any damages sustained by reason of breach of contract or failure to carry out the terms thereof.

Laws 1949, c. 3, § 2, p. 59;

Laws 1951, c. 5, § 2, p. 68;

Laws 1963, c. 4, § 3, p. 64;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 26;

Laws 2002, LB 1236, § 10.